Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6395.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11109. (1) The owner or operator of a landfill shall pay to the department a fee assessed on TENORM disposed of in the landfill. The fee is $5.00 $75.00 per ton, based on the quantity of TENORM specified on the monthly operating report. The fee for fractional tons of TENORM shall must be proportional. The fee shall must be paid within not later than 30 days after the end of each calendar year quarter. (2) The department shall take enforcement action to collect fees that are not paid as required by this section. (3) The landfill owner or operator shall forward to the department the fee revenue due under this section with a completed form that is provided or approved by the department. The owner or operator shall certify that all information provided in on the form is accurate. The form shall must specify the volume of TENORM disposed of at the landfill during the preceding calendar quarter and the amount of fee revenue being forwarded to the department. (4) The department shall maintain information regarding the fees collected under this section. (5) The TENORM account is created within the environmental pollution prevention fund created in section 11130. The department shall forward fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the TENORM account. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any other source for deposit into the account. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the TENORM account . The state treasurer shall and credit to the TENORM account interest and earnings from account investments. Money remaining that remains in the TENORM account at the close of the fiscal year shall does not lapse to the general fund. (6) Money from the TENORM account shall must be expended, upon on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To pay refunds to generators under this section. (b) To fund the department's regulation and oversight of the disposal of TENORM in this state. (c) To provide grants to local units of government and landfill operators to obtain equipment to monitor TENORM radiation. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6396 (request no. H03902'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.